Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2535.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 28-145, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Section 49-447, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-447. Motor vehicle and combustion engine emission; standards; notice a. The director shall adopt rules setting forth standards controlling the release into the atmosphere of air contaminants from motor vehicles and combustion engines. Any rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be consistent with provisions of federal law, if any, relating to control of emissions from motor vehicles or combustion engines.  This authority shall apply to implement the provisions of sections 28-955 and 49-542. B. Notwithstanding any other law and as provided by section 177 of the clean air act, the director shall adopt rules to implement vehicle emissions standards for vehicles model year 2028 or newer that are identical to the standards adopted by the California air resources board.  the director shall adopt rules to implement only the standards for which the United States environmental protection agency has granted a waiver to the California air resources board. C. On the director's receipt of a notice of final rulemaking for rules or any amendments to rules adopted pursuant to this section, the director shall notify in writing the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, president of the senate, director of the legislative council and secretary of state of both of the following: 1. The rules adopted or amended. 2. The California air resources board standards the adopted rule or amendment to the adopted rule implements. END_STATUTE